Wyoming, session 2025, HB0147.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-25-101 is created to read:
CHAPTER 25
PROHIBITED PRACTICES OF STATE INSTITUTIONS
ARTICLE 1
DIVERSITY, EQUITY AND INCLUSION ACTIVITIES
9-25-101. Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Diversity, equity or inclusion" means any
program, activity or policy that promotes differential or
preferential treatment of individuals or classifies
individuals on the basis of race, color, religion, sex,
ethnicity or national origin;
(ii) "Governmental entity" means the state, any
department thereof, the University of Wyoming and any
county, city, town, school district, community college
district, other political subdivision and other public
corporation of the state;
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0147
ENROLLED ACT NO. 67, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iii) "Institutional discrimination" means any
of the following concepts:
(A) That any race, color, religion, sex,
ethnicity or national origin is inherently superior or
inferior;
(B) That a person should be discriminated
against or adversely treated because of the person's race,
color, religion, sex, ethnicity or national origin;
(C) That the moral character of a person is
determined by the person's race, color, religion, sex,
ethnicity or national origin;
(D) That because of a person's race, color,
religion, sex, ethnicity or national origin the person is
inherently racist, sexist or oppressive, whether
consciously or subconsciously;
(E) That by virtue of a person's race,
color, religion, sex, ethnicity or national origin, the
person is inherently responsible for actions committed in
the past by other members of the same race, color,
religion, sex, ethnicity or national origin;
(F) That fault, blame or bias should be
assigned to members of a race, color, religion, sex,
ethnicity or national origin, on the basis of race, color,
religion, sex, ethnicity or national origin;
(G) That any person should accept,
acknowledge, affirm or assent to a sense of guilt,
complicity or a need to apologize on the basis of the
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0147
ENROLLED ACT NO. 67, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
person's race, color, religion, sex, ethnicity or national
origin;
(H) That meritocracy or certain traits
including a hard work ethic are racist or sexist.
(b) No governmental entity shall:
(i) Engage in any diversity, equity or inclusion
program, activity or policy;
(ii) Engage in institutional discrimination;
(iii) Require instruction promoting
institutional discrimination;
(iv) Require any student, employee or contractor
to attend or participate in any diversity, equity or
inclusion program or training or any institutional
discrimination program or training.
(c) As a political class, classification or identity,
federally recognized Indian tribes and programs, trainings,
degrees, classes or endowments related to federally
recognized Indian tribes or Indian history, culture,
language and traditions, are not diversity, equity and
inclusion as defined by this section. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to apply to federally recognized
Indian tribes. For purposes of this section:
(i) "Federally recognized Indian tribe" means a
tribal government and its citizens who have an acknowledged
government-to-government relationship with the United
States of America;
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0147
ENROLLED ACT NO. 67, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) Federally recognized Indian tribes and
their citizens shall be considered a political class,
classification or identity. Tribes and their members shall
not be considered a race or a racial classification.
Section 2. Not later than July 1, 2025, all
governmental entities as defined in section 1 of this act
shall take any actions required to implement this act
including the promulgation of rules, if necessary.
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0147
ENROLLED ACT NO. 67, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
5